Maryland, session 2026, HB0958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–321.
THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ADOPT OR ENFORCE ANY REGULATION OR ORDER
THAT PROHIBITS A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY FROM OFFERING A DISCOUNT OR
PAYMENT PLAN FOR THE CONNECTION OR EXTENSION OF A NATURAL GAS LINE TO A
CUSTOMER’S PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0958*